Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.240

Commission shall reimburse department for certain costs—Funding of staff support.

(1) The commission shall reimburse the department for all costs incurred by the department for actions necessary to carry out this chapter, including the adoption of rules, facilitating or conducting nominations or advisory votes, and the review and approval required under RCW 15.115.150.

(2) The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards or commissions in accordance with RCW 43.23.033 if a position is not directly funded by the legislature and costs are related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted by the director.

[ 2009 c 33 s 25.]